Hawaii statutes.
§604-9 Same; powers. District courts
shall have power, subject to appeal according to law and except as otherwise
provided in cases in which the accused has the right to and demands a trial by
jury in the first instance, to try without a jury, and to render judgment in
all cases of criminal offenses coming within their respective jurisdictions. [L
1892, c 57, §11; am L 1901, c 2, §2; RL 1925, §2277; RL 1935, §3766; RL 1945,
§9677; am L 1947, c 231, §1; RL 1955, §216-8; am L 1961, c 47, §1; HRS §604-9; am
L 1970, c 188, §17; am L 1971, c 144, §6B]

Case Notes

Where jury trial demanded, no jurisdiction to commit
defendant for trial to circuit court in the absence of evidence tending to show
commission of offense. 22 H. 614 (1915).

No jury trial in first instance for trivial offense. 27 H.
844, 847 (1924).

"Right" to jury trial refers to constitutional
guarantee involving "serious" offenses, in absence of specific
statutory right to jury trial. 51 H. 612, 466 P.2d 422 (1970).

Cited: 23 H. 91, 96 (1915); 23 H. 766 (1917); 27 H. 237, 240
(1923); 45 H. 109, 110, 363 P.2d 790 (1961).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next